Indiana, session 2026, HB1230.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 4-21.5-2.5-9, AS ADDED BY P.L.215-2017,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9. The agency shall determine if the alleged
violator has substantially corrected the violation and notify the alleged
violator whether the alleged violator is in substantial compliance with
the applicable rule or state statute not more than thirty (30) ninety (90)
days after the earlier of the date that:
(1) the alleged violation must be corrected under the corrective
plan; or
(2) the alleged violator notifies the agency that the alleged
violator has corrected the violation.
SECTION 2. IC 25-0.5-7-1, AS ADDED BY P.L.3-2014, SECTION
5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]: Sec. 1. This chapter sets forth the entities for which the Indiana
professional licensing agency performs administrative functions,
duties, and responsibilities under IC 25-1-6-3(a). IC 25-1-5-3.
SECTION 3. IC 25-0.5-7-2, AS ADDED BY P.L.3-2014, SECTION
5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]: Sec. 2. The Indiana professional licensing agency shall perform
administrative functions, duties, and responsibilities for the Indiana
board of accountancy (IC 25-2.1-2-1) under IC 25-1-6-3(a).
HEA 1230

2
IC 25-1-5-3.
SECTION 4. IC 25-0.5-7-3, AS ADDED BY P.L.3-2014, SECTION
5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]: Sec. 3. The Indiana professional licensing agency shall perform
administrative functions, duties, and responsibilities for the board of
registration for architects and landscape architects (IC 25-4-1-2) under
IC 25-1-6-3(a). IC 25-1-5-3.
SECTION 5. IC 25-0.5-7-4, AS ADDED BY P.L.3-2014, SECTION
5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]: Sec. 4. The Indiana professional licensing agency shall perform
administrative functions, duties, and responsibilities for the Indiana
auctioneer commission (IC 25-6.1-2-1) under IC 25-1-6-3(a).
IC 25-1-5-3.
SECTION 6. IC 25-0.5-7-5, AS ADDED BY P.L.3-2014, SECTION
5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]: Sec. 5. The Indiana professional licensing agency shall perform
administrative functions, duties, and responsibilities for the state board
of cosmetology and barber examiners (IC 25-8-3-1) under
IC 25-1-6-3(a). IC 25-1-5-3.
SECTION 7. IC 25-0.5-7-6, AS ADDED BY P.L.3-2014, SECTION
5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]: Sec. 6. The Indiana professional licensing agency shall perform
administrative functions, duties, and responsibilities for the state board
of funeral and cemetery service (IC 25-15-9) under IC 25-1-6-3(a).
IC 25-1-5-3.
SECTION 8. IC 25-0.5-7-7, AS ADDED BY P.L.3-2014, SECTION
5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]: Sec. 7. The Indiana professional licensing agency shall perform
administrative functions, duties, and responsibilities for the state board
of registration for professional engineers (IC 25-31-1-3) under
IC 25-1-6-3(a). IC 25-1-5-3.
SECTION 9. IC 25-0.5-7-8, AS ADDED BY P.L.3-2014, SECTION
5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]: Sec. 8. The Indiana professional licensing agency shall perform
administrative functions, duties, and responsibilities for the Indiana
plumbing commission (IC 25-28.5-1-3) under IC 25-1-6-3(a).
IC 25-1-5-3.
SECTION 10. IC 25-0.5-7-9, AS ADDED BY P.L.3-2014,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9. The Indiana professional licensing agency shall
perform administrative functions, duties, and responsibilities for the
Indiana real estate commission (IC 25-34.1) under IC 25-1-6-3(a).
HEA 1230

3
IC 25-1-5-3.
SECTION 11. IC 25-0.5-7-10, AS ADDED BY P.L.3-2014,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10. The Indiana professional licensing agency
shall perform administrative functions, duties, and responsibilities for
the real estate appraiser licensure and certification board
(IC 25-34.1-8-1) under IC 25-1-6-3(a). IC 25-1-5-3.
SECTION 12. IC 25-0.5-7-11, AS ADDED BY P.L.3-2014,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 11. The Indiana professional licensing agency
shall perform administrative functions, duties, and responsibilities for
the private investigator and security guard licensing board
(IC 25-30-1-5.2) under IC 25-1-6-3(a). IC 25-1-5-3.
SECTION 13. IC 25-0.5-7-12, AS ADDED BY P.L.3-2014,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 12. The Indiana professional licensing agency
shall perform administrative functions, duties, and responsibilities for
the state board of registration for professional surveyors
(IC 25-21.5-2-1) under IC 25-1-6-3(a). IC 25-1-5-3.
SECTION 14. IC 25-0.5-7-13, AS ADDED BY P.L.3-2014,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 13. The Indiana professional licensing agency
shall perform administrative functions, duties, and responsibilities for
the manufactured home installer licensing board (IC 25-23.7) under
IC 25-1-6-3(a). IC 25-1-5-3.
SECTION 15. IC 25-0.5-7-14, AS ADDED BY P.L.3-2014,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 14. The Indiana professional licensing agency
shall perform administrative functions, duties, and responsibilities for
the home inspectors licensing board (IC 25-20.2-3-1) under
IC 25-1-6-3(a). IC 25-1-5-3.
SECTION 16. IC 25-0.5-7-15, AS ADDED BY P.L.3-2014,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 15. The Indiana professional licensing agency
shall perform administrative functions, duties, and responsibilities for
the state board of massage therapy (IC 25-21.8-2-1) under
IC 25-1-6-3(a). IC 25-1-5-3.
SECTION 17. IC 25-1-5-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.206-2005,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. The centralization of staff, functions, and
services contemplated by this chapter shall be done in such a way as to
enhance the Indiana professional licensing agency's ability to:
HEA 1230

4
(1) make maximum use of data processing as a means of more
efficient operation; and
(2) provide more services and carry out functions of superior
quality; and
(3) significantly reduce the number of staff needed to provide
services and carry out the agency's functions.
SECTION 18. IC 25-1-5-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.3-2014,
SECTION 10, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. The following terms are defined for this
chapter:
(1) "Agency" means the Indiana professional licensing agency
established by section 3 of this chapter.
(2) "Board" means any agency, board, advisory committee, or
group described in IC 25-0.5-5 or IC 25-0.5-7.
SECTION 19. IC 25-1-5-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.3-2014,
SECTION 11, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) There is established the Indiana professional
licensing agency. The agency shall perform all administrative
functions, duties, and responsibilities assigned by law or rule to the
executive director, secretary, or other statutory administrator of the
entities described in IC 25-0.5-5 or IC 25-0.5-7.
(b) Nothing in this chapter may be construed to give the agency
policy making authority, which authority remains with each board.
SECTION 20. IC 25-1-5-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.249-2023,
SECTION 79, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) The agency shall employ necessary staff,
including specialists and professionals, to carry out the administrative
duties and functions of the boards, including but not limited to:
(1) notice of board meetings and other communication services;
(2) recordkeeping of board meetings, proceedings, and actions;
(3) recordkeeping of all persons licensed, regulated, or certified
by a board;
(4) administration of examinations; and
(5) administration of license or certificate issuance or renewal.
(b) In addition, the agency:
(1) shall prepare a consolidated statement of the budget requests
of all the boards described in IC 25-0.5-5 or IC 25-0.5-7;
(2) may coordinate licensing or certification renewal cycles,
examination schedules, or other routine activities to efficiently
utilize agency staff, facilities, and transportation resources, and to
improve accessibility of board functions to the public;
(3) may consolidate, where feasible, office space, recordkeeping,
HEA 1230

5
and data processing services;
(4) shall operate and maintain the electronic registry of
professions established under IC 25-1-5.5;
(5) shall post each board's public meeting agenda on the
applicable board's website not less than seventy-two (72) hours
before a board's public meeting;
(6) shall post each board's public meeting minutes on the
applicable board's website not more than fourteen (14) calendar
days after adoption of the minutes by the board;
(7) shall post any vacancy on a board on the applicable board's
website within fourteen (14) calendar days of the vacancy;
(8) notwithstanding any other law:
(A) shall prescribe the application form and manner for each
board; and
(B) shall make any new application form publicly available on
the applicable board's website for sixty (60) calendar days
before being adopted by the agency; and
(9) shall send notification of incomplete items in an application
to the applicant every fourteen (14) calendar days after the
applicant initiates the application until the earlier of the
following:
(A) The date the application is completed.
(B) One (1) calendar year after the applicant initiates the
application.
(c) In administering the renewal of licenses or certificates under this
chapter, the agency shall send a notice of the upcoming expiration of
a license or certificate to each holder of a license or certificate at least
ninety (90) days before the expiration of the license or certificate. The
notice must inform the holder of the license or certificate of the need
to renew the license or certificate and the requirement of payment of
the renewal fee. If this notice of expiration is not sent by the agency,
the holder of the license or certificate is not subject to a sanction for
failure to renew if, once notice is received from the agency, the license
or certificate is renewed within forty-five (45) days after receipt of the
notice.
(d) In administering an examination for licensure or certification,
the agency shall make the appropriate application forms available at
least thirty (30) days before the deadline for submitting an application
to all persons wishing to take the examination.
(e) The agency may require an applicant for license or certificate
renewal to submit evidence proving that:
(1) the applicant continues to meet the minimum requirements for
HEA 1230

6
licensure or certification; and
(2) the applicant is not in violation of:
(A) the statute regulating the applicant's profession; or
(B) rules adopted by the board regulating the applicant's
profession.
(f) The agency shall process an application for renewal of a license
or certificate:
(1) not later than ten (10) days after the agency receives all
required forms and evidence; or
(2) within twenty-four (24) hours after the time that an applicant
for renewal appears in person at the agency with all required
forms and evidence.
This subsection does not require the agency to issue a renewal license
or certificate to an applicant if subsection (g) applies.
(g) The agency may delay issuing a license or certificate renewal
for up to one hundred twenty (120) days after the renewal date for the
purpose of permitting the board to investigate information received by
the agency that the applicant for renewal may have committed an act
for which the applicant may be disciplined. If the agency delays issuing
a license or certificate renewal, the agency shall notify the applicant
that the applicant is being investigated. Except as provided in
subsection (h), before the end of the one hundred twenty (120) day
period, the board shall do one (1) of the following:
(1) Deny the license or certificate renewal following a personal
appearance by the applicant before the board.
(2) Issue the license or certificate renewal upon satisfaction of all
other conditions for renewal.
(3) Issue the license or certificate renewal and file a complaint
under IC 25-1-7.
(4) Upon agreement of the applicant and the board and following
a personal appearance by the applicant before the board, renew
the license or certificate and place the applicant on probation
status under IC 25-1-9-9.
(h) If an individual fails to appear before the board under subsection
(g), the board may take action on the applicant's license or certificate
allowed under subsection (g)(1), (g)(2), or (g)(3).
(i) The applicant's license or certificate remains valid until the final
determination of the board is rendered unless the renewal is denied or
the license is summarily suspended under IC 25-1-9-10.
(j) The license or certificate of the applicant for a license or
certificate renewal remains valid during the one hundred twenty (120)
day period unless the license or certificate renewal is denied following
HEA 1230

7
a personal appearance by the applicant before the board before the end
of the one hundred twenty (120) day period. If the one hundred twenty
(120) day period expires without action by the board, the license shall
be or certificate is automatically renewed at the end of the one
hundred twenty (120) day period.
(k) The board's renewal of a license or certificate does not preclude
the board from imposing sanctions on the licensee or certificate
holder as a result of a complaint filed by the attorney general after
renewal of the license or certificate.
(l) Notwithstanding any other statute or rule, the agency may
stagger license or certificate renewal cycles. However, if a renewal
cycle for a specific board or committee is changed, the agency must
obtain the approval of the affected board or committee.
(m) An application for a license, certificate, registration, or permit
is abandoned without an action of the board, if the applicant does not
complete the requirements to complete the application within one (1)
year after the date on which the application was filed. However, the
board may, for good cause shown, extend the validity of the application
for additional thirty (30) day periods. An application submitted after
the abandonment of an application is considered a new application.
SECTION 21. IC 25-1-5-4.7 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 4.7. A person who has a license or certificate renewal
denied by a board described in IC 25-0.5-7 may file an appeal of
the denial under IC 4-21.5-3.
SECTION 22. IC 25-1-5-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.3-2014,
SECTION 13, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) The agency shall be administered by an
executive director appointed by the governor who shall serve at the will
and pleasure of the governor.
(b) The executive director must be qualified by experience and
training.
(c) The term "executive director" or "secretary", or any other
statutory term for the administrative officer of a board described in
IC 25-0.5-5 or IC 25-0.5-7, means the executive director of the agency
or the executive director's designee.
(d) The executive director is the chief fiscal officer of the agency
and is responsible for hiring of all staff, and for procurement of all
services and supplies in accordance with IC 5-22. The executive
director may appoint not more than three (3) deputy directors, who
must be qualified to work for the boards which are served by the
agency.
HEA 1230

8
(e) The executive director shall execute a bond payable to the state,
with surety to consist of a surety or guaranty corporation qualified to do
business in Indiana, in an amount fixed by the state board of accounts,
conditioned upon the faithful performance of duties and the accounting
for all money and property that come into the executive director's hands
or under the executive director's control. The executive director may
likewise cause any employee of the agency to execute a bond if that
employee receives, disburses, or in any way handles funds or property
of the agency. The costs of any such bonds shall be paid from funds
available to the agency.
(f) The executive director may present to the general assembly
legislative recommendations regarding operations of the agency and
the boards it serves, including adoption of four (4) year license or
certificate renewal cycles wherever feasible.
(g) The executive director may execute orders, subpoenas,
continuances, and other legal documents on behalf of a board or
committee when requested to do so by the board or committee.
(h) The executive director or the executive director's designee may,
upon request of a board or committee, provide advice and technical
assistance on issues that may be presented to the boards or committees.
SECTION 23. IC 25-1-5-11, AS AMENDED BY P.L.143-2025,
SECTION 42, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 11. (a) As used in this section, "applicant" means
an individual who applies for a license, certificate, registration, or
permit issued by a board under this title.
(b) As used in this section, "licensee" means an individual who is or
has been licensed, certified, or registered by a board under this title.
(c) As used in this section, "personal information" means the
following:
(1) Home telephone number.
(2) Electronic mail address.
(3) Mailing address.
(d) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the personal
information of an individual who is:
(1) a licensee;
(2) an applicant; or
(3) a board member;
is confidential for purposes of IC 5-14-3-4 and may not be disclosed to
the public by the agency or a board.
(e) Except as provided in IC 25-23-1-12.6, an applicant or a licensee
shall provide the applicant's or licensee's Social Security number to the
agency.
HEA 1230

9
(f) The agency and the boards shall collect and release the
applicant's or licensee's Social Security number as provided in state or
federal law.
(g) Notwithstanding IC 4-1-10-3, the agency and the boards may
allow access to the Social Security number of each applicant or
licensee to:
(1) a testing service that provides the examination for licensure,
certification, or registration to the agency or the boards; or
(2) an individual state regulatory board or an organization
composed of state regulatory boards for the applicant's or
licensee's profession for the purpose of coordinating:
(A) licensure, certification, or registration; and
(B) disciplinary activities among the individual states.
(h) Notwithstanding subsection (d), the agency or a board may
disclose personal information of an individual described in subsection
(d) if the person requesting the information provides proof of identity
and represents that the use of the personal information will be strictly
limited to at least one (1) of the following:
(1) For use by a government agency, including a court or law
enforcement agency, in carrying out its functions, or a person
acting on behalf of a government agency in carrying out its
functions.
(2) For use in connection with a civil, a criminal, an
administrative, or an arbitration proceeding in a court or
government agency or before a self-regulatory body, including the
service of process, investigation in anticipation of litigation, and
the execution or enforcement of judgments and orders, or under
an order of a court.
(3) For use in research activities, and for use in producing
statistical reports, as long as the personal information is not
published, re-disclosed, or used to contact the individuals who are
the subject of the personal information.
(4) For use by any person, when the person demonstrates, in a
form and manner prescribed by the agency, that written consent
has been obtained from the individual who is the subject of the
information.
(5) For any other use specifically authorized by law that is related
to the agency or a board or to public safety.
SECTION 24. IC 25-1-5-12 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 12. (a) The agency and the boards shall allow the
department of state revenue, the alcohol and tobacco commission,
HEA 1230

10
and the bureau of motor vehicles access to the name of each person
who:
(1) is licensed under this article; or
(2) has applied for a license under this article.
(b) If the department of state revenue notifies the agency that a
person is on the most recent tax warrant list, the agency shall not
issue or renew the person's license until:
(1) the person provides to the agency a statement from the
department of state revenue indicating that the person's tax
warrant has been satisfied; or
(2) the agency receives a notice from the commissioner of the
department of state revenue under IC 6-8.1-8-2(k).
(c) If the alcohol and tobacco commission notifies the agency
that a person has an outstanding balance due to the alcohol and
tobacco commission, the agency shall not issue or renew the
person's license until the person provides to the agency a statement
from the alcohol and tobacco commission indicating that the
person's outstanding balance has been satisfied.
(d) If the bureau of motor vehicles notifies the agency that a
person has an outstanding balance due to the bureau of motor
vehicles because a check, draft, or order issued or delivered by the
person to the bureau of motor vehicles was returned or dishonored
because of insufficient funds, the agency shall not issue or renew
the person's license until the person provides to the agency a
statement from the bureau of motor vehicles indicating that the
person's outstanding balance has been satisfied.
SECTION 25. IC 25-1-6 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]. (Professional Licensing Agency Functions and Duties).
SECTION 26. IC 25-1-9-9 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9. (a) The board may
impose any of the following sanctions, singly or in combination, if it
finds that a practitioner is subject to disciplinary sanctions under
section 4, 5, 6, 6.7, or 6.9 of this chapter or IC 25-1-5-4:
(1) Permanently revoke a practitioner's license.
(2) Suspend a practitioner's license.
(3) Censure a practitioner.
(4) Issue a letter of reprimand.
(5) Place a practitioner on probation status and require the
practitioner to:
(A) report regularly to the board upon the matters that are the
basis of probation;
(B) limit practice to those areas prescribed by the board;
HEA 1230

11
(C) continue or renew professional education under a
preceptor, or as otherwise directed or approved by the board,
until a satisfactory degree of skill has been attained in those
areas that are the basis of the probation; or
(D) perform or refrain from performing any acts, including
community restitution or service without compensation, that
the board considers appropriate to the public interest or to the
rehabilitation or treatment of the practitioner.
(6) Assess a fine as follows against the practitioner in an amount
not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each violation
listed in section 4 of this chapter, except for a finding of
incompetency due to a physical or mental disability:
(A) For an individual practitioner, in an amount not to
exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) per violation.
(B) For a business entity, in an amount not to exceed five
thousand dollars ($5,000) per violation.
When imposing a fine, the board shall consider a practitioner's
ability to pay the amount assessed. If the practitioner fails to pay
the fine within the time specified by the board, the board may
suspend the practitioner's license without additional proceedings.
However, a suspension may not be imposed if the sole basis for
the suspension is the practitioner's inability to pay a fine.
(b) The board may withdraw or modify the probation under
subsection (a)(5) if it finds, after a hearing, that the deficiency that
required disciplinary action has been remedied, or that changed
circumstances warrant a modification of the order.
SECTION 27. IC 25-1-11-12, AS AMENDED BY P.L.83-2024,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 12. (a) The board may impose any of the
following sanctions, singly or in combination, if the board finds that a
practitioner is subject to disciplinary sanctions under sections 5
through 9 of this chapter:
(1) Permanently revoke a practitioner's license.
(2) Suspend a practitioner's license.
(3) Censure a practitioner.
(4) Issue a letter of reprimand.
(5) Place a practitioner on probation status and require the
practitioner to:
(A) report regularly to the board upon the matters that are the
basis of probation;
(B) limit practice to those areas prescribed by the board;
(C) continue or renew professional education approved by the
HEA 1230

12
board until a satisfactory degree of skill has been attained in
those areas that are the basis of the probation;
(D) perform or refrain from performing any acts, including
community restitution or service without compensation, that
the board considers appropriate to the public interest or to the
rehabilitation or treatment of the practitioner; or
(E) satisfactorily complete a peer review specified by the
board as a condition for termination of probationary status if
the practitioner is a licensee (as defined in IC 25-2.1-1-8).
(6) Assess a civil penalty as follows against the practitioner for
not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each violation
listed in sections 5 through 9 of this chapter except for a finding
of incompetency due to a physical or mental disability:
(A) For an individual practitioner, in an amount not to
exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) per violation.
(B) For a business entity, in an amount not to exceed five
thousand dollars ($5,000) per violation.
(7) Order a practitioner to pay consumer restitution to a person
who suffered damages as a result of the conduct or omission that
was the basis for the disciplinary sanctions under this chapter.
(b) When imposing a civil penalty under subsection (a)(6), the board
shall consider a practitioner's ability to pay the amount assessed. If the
practitioner fails to pay the civil penalty within the time specified by
the board, the board may suspend the practitioner's license without
additional proceedings. However, a suspension may not be imposed if
the sole basis for the suspension is the practitioner's inability to pay a
civil penalty.
(c) The board may withdraw or modify the probation under
subsection (a)(5) if the board finds after a hearing that the deficiency
that required disciplinary action has been remedied or that changed
circumstances warrant a modification of the order.
SECTION 28. IC 25-2.1-4-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.177-2015,
SECTION 11, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) Subject to IC 25-1-2-6(e), an initial and
renewed certificate expires on the date established by the licensing
agency under IC 25-1-6-4. IC 25-1-5-4.
(b) An individual may renew a certificate by paying a renewal fee
and complying with the continuing education requirements established
under section 5 of this chapter on or before the expiration date of the
certificate.
(c) If an individual fails to pay a renewal fee on or before the
expiration date of a certificate, the certificate becomes invalid without
HEA 1230

13
further action by the board.
(d) If an individual holds a certificate that has been invalid for not
more than three (3) years, the board shall reinstate the certificate if the
individual meets the requirements of IC 25-1-8-6(c).
(e) If more than three (3) years have elapsed since the date a
certificate expired, the individual who holds the certificate may seek
reinstatement of the certificate by satisfying the requirements for
reinstatement under IC 25-1-8-6(d).
SECTION 29. IC 25-2.1-9-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.197-2011,
SECTION 82, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) If the board has reason to believe that the
subject of an investigation has committed a violation of this article or
IC 25-1-11:
(1) the board shall direct that a complaint be issued under
IC 25-1-7, if the subject of the investigation is a licensee; and
(2) the board shall take appropriate action under IC 25-1-7-14, if
the subject of the investigation is not a licensee.
(b) Subsection (a) does not prohibit the board from taking an action
permitted under IC 25-1 or IC 25-2.1-8-2, including an action under the
following:
(1) IC 25-1-4-5 (conditional license and other actions related to
continuing education or lapsed license).
(2) IC 25-1-6-4 IC 25-1-5-4 (refusal to issue a license or
placement on probationary status).
(c) If the board does not proceed under subsection (a) or (b), the
board shall close the matter and may release the information only with
the consent of the individual or firm that was under investigation.
SECTION 30. IC 25-4-1-14, AS AMENDED BY P.L.177-2015,
SECTION 13, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 14. (a) Subject to IC 25-1-2-6(e), every registered
architect who continues in active practice shall, biennially, on or before
the date established by the licensing agency under IC 25-1-6-4,
IC 25-1-5-4, renew the registered architect's certificate of registration
and pay the required renewal fee.
(b) An architect registered or licensed in Indiana who has failed to
renew the architect's certificate of registration for a period of not more
than five (5) years may have the certificate of registration reinstated by
meeting the requirements of IC 25-1-8-6(c).
(c) An architect registered in Indiana who has failed to renew the
architect's certificate of registration for more than five (5) years may
have the certificate of registration reinstated by satisfying the
requirements for reinstatement under IC 25-1-8-6(d).
HEA 1230

14
(d) If any registered architect desires to retire from the practice of
architecture in Indiana, the architect may submit to the board the
architect's verified statement of intention to withdraw from practice.
The statement shall be entered upon the records of the board. During
the period of the architect's retirement, the architect is not liable for any
renewal or restoration fees.
(e) If any retired architect desires to return to the practice of
architecture in Indiana, the retired architect must meet the following
requirements:
(1) If the certificate of registration has been expired for not more
than five (5) years, the retired architect must:
(A) file with the board a verified statement indicating the
architect's desire to return to the practice of architecture; and
(B) pay a renewal fee equal to the fee set by the board to renew
an unexpired registration under this chapter.
(2) If the certificate of registration has been expired for more than
five (5) years, the retired architect must:
(A) file with the board a verified statement indicating the
architect's desire to return to the practice of architecture;
(B) pay a renewal fee equal to the fee set by the board to renew
an unexpired registration under this chapter; and
(C) complete remediation and additional training established
by the board based on the length of time the certificate of
registration has been expired.
SECTION 31. IC 25-4-2-8.5, AS ADDED BY P.L.105-2008,
SECTION 14, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8.5. (a) Every registered landscape architect who
continues in active practice shall biennially, on or before the date
established by the licensing agency under IC 25-1-6-4, IC 25-1-5-4,
renew the registered landscape architect's certificate of registration and
pay the required renewal fee.
(b) A landscape architect registered in Indiana who has failed to
renew the landscape architect's certificate of registration for a period
of not more than five (5) years may have the certificate of registration
reinstated by meeting the requirements of IC 25-1-8-6(c).
(c) A landscape architect registered in Indiana who has failed to
renew the landscape architect's certificate of registration for a period
of more than five (5) years may have the certificate of registration
reinstated by satisfying the requirements for reinstatement under
IC 25-1-8-6(d).
SECTION 32. IC 25-6.1-3-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.158-2018,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
HEA 1230

15
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) Every individual, before acting as an
auctioneer, must obtain a license from the commission.
(b) An applicant for a license must:
(1) be at least eighteen (18) years of age;
(2) have completed at least eighty (80) actual hours of auction
instruction from a course provider approved by the commission;
(3) not have a conviction for:
(A) an act which would constitute a ground for disciplinary
sanction under IC 25-1-11; or
(B) a felony that has a direct bearing on the applicant's ability
to practice competently.
(c) Auction instruction required under subsection (b) must provide
the applicant with knowledge of all of the following:
(1) The value of real estate and of various goods commonly sold
at an auction.
(2) Bid calling.
(3) Sale preparation, sale advertising, and sale summary.
(4) Mathematics.
(5) The provisions of this article and the commission's rules.
(6) Any other subject matter approved by the commission.
(d) For purposes of subsection (b)(2), the commission may approve
online auction instruction that complies with subsection (c) and is
offered by a course provider approved by the commission.
(e) An individual seeking an initial license as an auctioneer under
this article shall file with the commission a completed application on
the form prescribed by the commission. When filing an application for
an auctioneer license, each individual shall pay a nonrefundable
examination fee established by the commission under IC 25-1-8-2.
(f) When applying for a renewal of an auctioneer license, each
individual shall do the following:
(1) Apply in a manner required by the commission, including
certification by the applicant that the applicant has complied with
the requirements of IC 25-6.1-9-8, unless the commission has
granted the applicant a waiver under IC 25-6.1-9-9.
(2) Pay the renewal fee established by the commission under
IC 25-1-8-2.
(g) Upon the receipt of a completed application for an initial or a
renewal license, the commission shall examine the application and may
verify the information contained therein.
(h) An applicant who is seeking an initial license must pass an
examination approved by the commission that covers subjects and
topics of knowledge required to practice as an auctioneer. The
HEA 1230

16
commission shall hold examinations as the commission may prescribe.
(i) The commission shall issue an auctioneer's license, in such form
as it may prescribe, to each individual who meets all of the
requirements for licensing and pays the appropriate fees.
(j) Auctioneer licenses shall be issued for a term of four (4) years.
Subject to IC 25-1-2-6(e), a license expires at midnight on the date
established by the licensing agency under IC 25-1-6-4 IC 25-1-5-4 and
every fourth year thereafter, unless renewed before that date. If the
license has expired, it may be reinstated not later than four (4) years
after the date it expired if the license holder meets the requirements of
IC 25-1-8-6(c).
(k) If a license has expired for a period of more than four (4) years,
the holder of the license may have the license reinstated by satisfying
the requirements for reinstatement under IC 25-1-8-6(d).
(l) The commission may waive the requirement that a nonresident
applicant pass an examination and that the nonresident submit written
statements by two (2) individuals, if the nonresident applicant:
(1) is licensed to act as an auctioneer in the state of the applicant's
domicile;
(2) submits with the application a duly certified letter of
certification issued by the licensing board of the applicant's
domiciliary state;
(3) is a resident of a state whose licensing requirements are
substantially equal to the requirements of Indiana;
(4) is a resident of a state that grants the same privileges to the
licensees of Indiana; and
(5) includes with the application an irrevocable consent that
actions may be commenced against the applicant. The consent
shall stipulate that service of process or pleadings on the
commission shall be taken and held in all courts as valid and
binding as if service of process had been made upon the applicant
personally within this state. If any process or pleading mentioned
in this subsection is served upon the commission, it shall be by
duplicate copies. One (1) of the duplicate copies shall be filed in
the office of the commission and one (1) shall be immediately
forwarded by the commission by registered or certified mail to the
applicant against whom the process or pleadings are directed.
(m) The commission may enter into a reciprocal agreement with
another state concerning nonresident applicants.
SECTION 33. IC 25-6.1-3-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.86-2018,
SECTION 198, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) Every person other than:
HEA 1230

17
(1) an individual who is a licensed auctioneer; or
(2) an individual who has a licensed auction house (until July 1,
2014);
who is seeking to operate as an auction company must obtain a license
from the commission. Notwithstanding the fact that an individual who
is a licensed auctioneer or (until July 1, 2014) an individual who has a
licensed auction house also has an interest in an organization, every
organization which seeks to operate an auction company must obtain
a license for that auction company.
(b) An individual who holds an unexpired auction house license
under IC 25-6.1-3-3 (before its repeal) may file with the commission
a completed application for an auction company license on the form
prescribed by the commission in rules adopted by the commission
under IC 4-22-2. Upon the receipt of a completed application for an
auction company license under this chapter, the commission shall
examine the application and may verify the information contained in
the application. Upon a determination by the commission that an
application is complete and verified, the commission shall issue an
auction company license, in a form it prescribes, to the applicant for a
term equal to the remaining term of the unexpired auction house
license. If an individual described in this subsection files a completed
application for an auction company license before June 1, 2014, the
commission shall determine whether the application is complete and
verified before June 15, 2014. If the commission determines that the
application is complete and verified, the commission shall issue the
individual an auction company license before July 1, 2014.
(c) Every such person shall file with the commission a complete
application on the form prescribed by the commission. Each
application shall be accompanied by the license fee prescribed by
section 5 of this chapter and a surcharge described in IC 25-6.1-8-2.
(d) Upon the receipt of a completed application for an initial or
renewal license, the commission shall examine the application and may
verify the information contained therein.
(e) Upon a determination by the commission that an application is
complete and duly verified, the commission shall issue an auction
company license, in such form as it may prescribe, to the applicant.
(f) Auction company licenses shall expire on a date established by
the licensing agency under IC 25-1-6-4, IC 25-1-5-4, and every fourth
year thereafter.
(g) If the holder of an auction company license does not renew the
license by the date established by the licensing agency, the license
expires and becomes invalid without any action taken by the
HEA 1230

18
commission.
(h) The holder of an auction company license that has been expired
for not more than four (4) years may have the license reinstated by
meeting the requirements under IC 25-1-8-6(c).
(i) The holder of an auction company license that has been expired
for more than four (4) years may have the license reinstated by
satisfying the requirements for reinstatement under IC 25-1-8-6(d).
(j) Any individual who wishes to operate an auction company, and
who is exempt under subsection (a) from obtaining an auction company
license, shall, not more than thirty (30) days before the date on which
the individual begins to operate an auction company, notify the
commission, in a writing signed by the individual, that the individual
is operating as an auction company or as more than one (1) auction
company. The individual shall specify in such written notification the
trade or business name, and the address of the principal place of
business, of each auction company which the individual operates.
Whenever an individual to whom this subsection applies shall
discontinue the operation of an auction company operated by the
individual, or shall change its address or trade or business name, the
individual shall promptly notify the secretary of the commission of
such discontinuance or change, in a writing signed by the individual.
SECTION 34. IC 25-8-3-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.249-2019,
SECTION 57, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) Each of the members of the board must
reside in Indiana.
(b) Subject to IC 25-1-6.5-3, the members of the board must meet
the following qualifications:
(1) Two (2) of the members must:
(A) possess a current cosmetologist license; and
(B) have practiced cosmetology in Indiana continuously for at
least five (5) years immediately before appointment.
(2) Two (2) of the members of the board must:
(A) possess a current barber license; and
(B) have practiced barbering in Indiana continuously for at
least five (5) years immediately before appointment.
(3) One (1) of the members must be an owner or operator of a
beauty culture school. However, the member may not be a
licensed barber or cosmetologist.
(4) One (1) of the members must be licensed as an electrologist,
an esthetician, or a manicurist.
(5) One (1) of the members must not have any association with
the practice of beauty culture, except as a consumer.
HEA 1230

19
SECTION 35. IC 25-8-4-17, AS AMENDED BY P.L.177-2015,
SECTION 18, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 17. (a) Subject to IC 25-1-2-6(e), and except for
an instructor license issued under subsection (c) or IC 25-8-6-1, a
license issued under this article expires on a date specified by the
licensing agency under IC 25-1-6-4 IC 25-1-5-4 and expires four (4)
years after the initial expiration date.
(b) A license issued to an instructor under IC 25-8-6-1 expires at the
time that the instructor's practitioner license expires. The board shall
renew an instructor's license under this subsection concurrently with
the instructor's practitioner license.
(c) Subject to IC 25-1-2-6(e), initial provisional licenses are valid
for a length of time determined by the board, but not to exceed two (2)
years.
SECTION 36. IC 25-8-15.4-9, AS AMENDED BY P.L.177-2015,
SECTION 28, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9. (a) Subject to IC 25-1-2-6(e), a license issued
under this chapter expires every fourth year on a date established by the
licensing agency under IC 25-1-6-4. IC 25-1-5-4.
(b) The board shall renew a license issued under this chapter if the
person that operates the facility pays the fee for renewal established by
the board under IC 25-1-8-2 on or before the date established by the
licensing agency.
(c) If the holder of a license does not renew the license on or before
the renewal date established by the licensing agency, the license
expires and becomes invalid without any action by the board.
SECTION 37. IC 25-15-6-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.177-2015,
SECTION 37, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) Subject to IC 25-1-2-6(e) and except as
provided in subsection (b), a license issued under this article expires on
the date established by the licensing agency under IC 25-1-6-4.
IC 25-1-5-4.
(b) A funeral director intern license expires two (2) years after it is
issued by the board.
SECTION 38. IC 25-20-1-1.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.249-2019,
SECTION 87, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1.5. (a) Subject to IC 25-1-6.5-3, there is
established the committee of hearing aid dealer examiners which
consists of five (5) members all appointed by the governor to a term
under IC 25-1-6.5. Three (3) Four (4) members must be hearing aid
dealers licensed under this chapter, who are residents of this state and
who have been practicing as hearing aid dealers for at least one (1) year
HEA 1230

20
prior to their appointment. One (1) member must be an
otolaryngologist in this state, who is a resident of this state and who has
been engaged in the practice of otolaryngology for at least one (1) year
prior to appointment to the committee. One (1) member must be a
resident of this state who is in no way associated with the business of
hearing aid dealers, audiology, or speech-language pathology other
than as a consumer. Whenever a vacancy occurs on the committee, the
governor shall appoint a successor under IC 25-1-6.5.
(b) Three (3) members present constitute a quorum.
(c) The members serve without compensation, except that each
member is entitled to the salary per diem as provided by IC 4-10-11-2.1
and to reimbursement for travel, lodging, meals, and other expenses as
provided in the state travel policies and procedures established by the
department of administration and approved by the state budget agency.
(d) A member may be removed under IC 25-1-6.5-4.
SECTION 39. IC 25-20.2-3-8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.84-2016,
SECTION 106, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. The board shall:
(1) administer and enforce this article;
(2) adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 that are reasonably necessary or
appropriate for the administration and enforcement of this article;
(3) prescribe the requirements for and the form of licenses,
applications, and other documents that are required by this article;
(4) grant, deny, suspend, and revoke approval of examinations
and courses of study;
(5) issue, deny, suspend, and revoke licenses in accordance with
this article;
(6) in accordance with IC 25-1-7, investigate complaints
concerning licensees or persons the board has reason to believe
should be licensees, including complaints concerning failure to
comply with this article or rules adopted under this article, and,
when appropriate, take action under IC 25-20.2-8;
(7) bring actions in the name of the state in an appropriate circuit
court, superior court, or probate court in order to enforce
compliance with this article or rules adopted under this article;
(8) establish fees in accordance with IC 25-1-8;
(9) inspect the records of a licensee in accordance with rules
adopted by the board;
(10) conduct or designate a member or other representative to
conduct public hearings on any matter for which a hearing is
required under this article and exercise all powers granted under
IC 4-21.5;
HEA 1230

21
(11) adopt a seal containing the words "Indiana Home Inspectors
Licensing Board" and, through the board's secretary, certify
copies and authenticate all acts of the board;
(12) in accordance with IC 25-1-6: IC 25-1-5:
(A) use counsel, consultants, and other persons;
(B) enter into contracts; and
(C) authorize expenditures;
that are reasonably necessary or appropriate to administer and
enforce this article and rules adopted under this article;
(13) establish continuing education requirements for licensed
home inspectors in accordance with IC 25-1-4;
(14) maintain the board's office, files, records, and property in the
city of Indianapolis; and
(15) exercise all other powers specifically conferred on the board
by this article.
SECTION 40. IC 25-20.2-6-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.177-2015,
SECTION 42, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. Subject to IC 25-1-2-6(e), a license for a home
inspector issued under this article expires on a date established by the
licensing agency under IC 25-1-6-4 IC 25-1-5-4 and shall be renewed
biennially upon payment of the required renewal fees.
SECTION 41. IC 25-21.5-1-9 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9. "Secretary" has the
meaning under IC 25-1-6-5(c). IC 25-1-5-5(c).
SECTION 42. IC 25-21.5-8-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.177-2015,
SECTION 45, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) Subject to IC 25-1-2-6(e), a certificate of
registration expires biennially on the date established by the licensing
agency under IC 25-1-6-4. IC 25-1-5-4.
(b) An individual may renew a certificate of registration by paying
a renewal fee on or before the expiration date established by the
licensing agency.
(c) If an individual fails to pay a renewal fee on or before the
expiration date of a certificate of registration, the certificate of
registration becomes invalid without any action of the board.
(d) A certificate of registration may be reinstated by the board not
later than three (3) years after its expiration if the applicant for
reinstatement meets the requirements for reinstatement under
IC 25-1-8-6(c).
(e) If a certificate of registration has been expired for more than
three (3) years, the certificate of registration may be reinstated by the
board if the holder meets the requirements for reinstatement under
HEA 1230

22
IC 25-1-8-6(d).
SECTION 43. IC 25-21.8-6-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.267-2017,
SECTION 19, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) Subject to IC 25-1-2-6(e), a license issued
by the board is valid for four (4) years.
(b) A license expires:
(1) at midnight on the date established by the licensing agency
under IC 25-1-6-4, IC 25-1-5-4, subject to IC 25-1-2-6(e); and
(2) every four (4) years thereafter, unless renewed before that
date.
SECTION 44. IC 25-23.7-2-8 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. "Secretary" has the
meaning set forth in IC 25-1-6-5(c). IC 25-1-5-5(c).
SECTION 45. IC 25-23.7-6-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.177-2015,
SECTION 60, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. Notwithstanding IC 25-1-2, but subject to
IC 25-1-2-6(e), the holder of a license issued under IC 25-23.7-5 must
renew the license and pay the required renewal fee every four (4) years
after it is issued on or before the date established by the Indiana
professional licensing agency under IC 25-1-6-4. IC 25-1-5-4.
SECTION 46. IC 25-28.5-1-8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.2-2005,
SECTION 67, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. The commission may:
(1) Adopt and promulgate rules and regulations for its guidance
and for the regulation of its business and procedure consistent
with the provisions of this chapter and in the manner provided in
IC 4-22-2.
(2) Enter into such other contracts and authorize expenditures as
its duties require, subject to the provisions of this chapter and
IC 25-1-6. IC 25-1-5.
(3) Do all things necessary for carrying into effect the provisions
of this chapter.
SECTION 47. IC 25-28.5-1-22, AS AMENDED BY P.L.177-2015,
SECTION 66, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 22. (a) Subject to IC 25-1-2-6(e), every license or
certificate of registration issued under this chapter expires on a date
established by the licensing agency under IC 25-1-6-4 IC 25-1-5-4 and
shall be renewed biennially thereafter upon payment of the required
renewal fees.
(b) Applications for renewal shall be filed with the commission in
the form and manner provided by the commission. The application
shall be accompanied by the required renewal fee. The commission,
HEA 1230

23
upon the receipt of the application for renewal and the required renewal
fee, shall issue to the renewal applicant a license or certificate of
registration in the category said applicant has previously held. Subject
to IC 25-1-2-6(e), unless renewed, a license issued by the commission
expires on the date specified by the licensing agency under
IC 25-1-6-4. IC 25-1-5-4.
(c) Subject to IC 25-1-2-6(e), a license or certificate of registration
lapses without any action by the commission if an application for
renewal has not been filed and the required fee has not been paid by the
established biennial renewal date.
(d) If a license or certificate of registration has been expired for not
more than three (3) years, the license or certificate of registration may
be reinstated by the commission if the holder of the license or
certificate of registration meets the requirements of IC 25-1-8-6(c).
(e) If a license or certificate of registration has been expired for
more than three (3) years, the license or certificate of registration may
be reinstated by the commission if the holder of the license or
certificate of registration meets the requirements for reinstatement
under IC 25-1-8-6(d).
SECTION 48. IC 25-30-1-16, AS AMENDED BY P.L.177-2015,
SECTION 68, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 16. (a) Subject to IC 25-1-2-6(e), unless renewed,
a license issued under this chapter expires on a date specified by the
licensing agency under IC 25-1-6-4 IC 25-1-5-4 and expires every four
(4) years after the initial expiration date. An applicant for renewal shall
pay the renewal fee established by the board under IC 25-1-8-2 on or
before the renewal date specified by the licensing agency.
(b) Subject to IC 25-1-2-6(e), if the holder of a license does not
renew the license by the date specified by the licensing agency, the
license expires and becomes invalid without any action taken by the
board.
(c) If a license has been expired for not more than three (3) years,
the license may be reinstated by the board if the holder of the license
meets the requirements under IC 25-1-8-6(c).
(d) If a license has been expired for more than three (3) years, the
license may be reinstated by the board if the holder of the license meets
the requirements for reinstatement under IC 25-1-8-6(d).
SECTION 49. IC 25-30-1.3-17, AS AMENDED BY P.L.177-2015,
SECTION 69, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 17. (a) Subject to IC 25-1-2-6(e), unless renewed,
a license issued under this chapter expires on a date specified by the
licensing agency under IC 25-1-6-4 IC 25-1-5-4 and expires every four
HEA 1230

24
(4) years after the initial expiration date. An applicant for renewal shall
pay the renewal fee established by the board under IC 25-1-8-2 on or
before the renewal date specified by the licensing agency.
(b) Subject to IC 25-1-2-6(e), if the holder of a license does not
renew the license by the date specified by the licensing agency, the
license expires and becomes invalid without any action taken by the
board.
(c) If a license has been expired for not more than three (3) years,
the license may be reinstated if the holder of the license meets the
requirements under IC 25-1-8-6(c).
(d) If a license has been expired for more than three (3) years, the
license may be reinstated by the board if the holder of the license meets
the requirements for reinstatement under IC 25-1-8-6(d).
SECTION 50. IC 25-31-1-17, AS AMENDED BY P.L.177-2015,
SECTION 70, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 17. (a) Subject to IC 25-1-2-6(e), unless renewed,
a certificate issued under this chapter expires on a date specified by the
licensing agency under IC 25-1-6-4 IC 25-1-5-4 and expires biennially
after the initial expiration date. An applicant for renewal shall submit
an application in the manner prescribed by the board and pay the
renewal fee established by the board under IC 25-1-8-2 on or before the
renewal date specified by the licensing agency.
(b) Subject to IC 25-1-2-6(e), if the holder of a certificate does not
renew the certificate by the date specified by the licensing agency, the
certificate expires and becomes invalid without the board taking any
action.
(c) The failure on the part of a registrant to renew a certificate does
not deprive the registrant of the right of renewal.
(d) If a certificate has been expired for not more than three (3) years,
the certificate may be reinstated by the board if the holder of the
certificate meets the requirements for reinstatement under
IC 25-1-8-6(c).
(e) If a certificate has been expired for more than three (3) years, the
certificate may be reinstated by the board if the holder of the certificate
meets the requirements for reinstatement under IC 25-1-8-6(d).
SECTION 51. IC 25-34.1-2-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.93-2024,
SECTION 191, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. The commission may:
(1) administer and enforce the provisions of this article;
(2) adopt rules in accordance with IC 4-22-2 and prescribe forms
for licenses, applications, and other documents which are
necessary or appropriate for the administration and enforcement
HEA 1230

25
of this article;
(3) issue, deny, suspend, and revoke licenses in accordance with
this article, which licenses shall remain the property of the
commission;
(4) subject to IC 25-1-7, investigate complaints concerning
licensees or persons the commission has reason to believe should
be licensees, including complaints respecting failure to comply
with this article or the rules, and, when appropriate, take action
pursuant to IC 25-34.1-6;
(5) bring actions, in the name of the state of Indiana, in an
appropriate circuit court, superior court, or probate court in order
to enforce compliance with this article or the rules;
(6) inspect the records of a licensee in accordance with rules and
standards prescribed by the commission;
(7) conduct, or designate a member or other representative to
conduct, public hearings on any matter for which a hearing is
required under this article and exercise all powers granted in
IC 4-21.5;
(8) adopt a seal containing the words "Indiana Real Estate
Commission" and, through its executive director, certify copies
and authenticate all acts of the commission;
(9) utilize counsel, consultants, and other persons who are
necessary or appropriate to administer and enforce this article and
the rules;
(10) enter into contracts and authorize expenditures that are
necessary or appropriate, subject to IC 25-1-6, IC 25-1-5, to
administer and enforce this article and the rules;
(11) maintain the commission's office, files, records, and property
in the city of Indianapolis;
(12) grant, deny, suspend, and revoke approval of examinations
and courses of study as provided in IC 25-34.1-5;
(13) provide for the filing and approval of surety bonds which are
required by IC 25-34.1-5;
(14) adopt rules in accordance with IC 4-22-2 necessary for the
administration of the investigative fund established under
IC 25-34.1-8-7.5;
(15) adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to adopt any or all parts of
Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal Practice (USPAP),
including the comments to the USPAP, as published by the
Appraisal Standards Board of the Appraisal Foundation, under the
authority of Title XI of the Financial Institutions Reform,
Recovery, and Enforcement Act (12 U.S.C. 3331-3351);
HEA 1230

26
(16) exercise other specific powers conferred upon the
commission by this article; and
(17) adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 governing education, including
prelicensing, postlicensing, and continuing education.
SECTION 52. IC 25-34.1-3-4.1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.32-2020,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4.1. (a) To obtain a broker license, an individual
must:
(1) be at least eighteen (18) years of age before applying for a
license and must not have a conviction for:
(A) an act that would constitute a ground for disciplinary
sanction under IC 25-1-11;
(B) a crime that has a direct bearing on the individual's ability
to practice competently; or
(C) a crime that indicates the individual has the propensity to
endanger the public;
(2) have a high school diploma or a general educational
development (GED) diploma under IC 20-20-6 (before its repeal)
or IC 22-4.1-18;
(3) have successfully completed an approved broker course of
study as prescribed in IC 25-34.1-5-5;
(4) apply for a license by submitting the application fee
prescribed by the commission and an application specifying:
(A) the name, address, and age of the applicant;
(B) the broker company with which the applicant intends to
associate;
(C) the address of the broker company;
(D) proof of compliance with subdivisions (2) and (3); and
(E) any other information the commission requires;
(5) pass a written examination prepared and administered by the
commission or its duly appointed agent; and
(6) within one (1) year after passing the commission examination,
submit the license fee established by the commission under
IC 25-1-8-2. If an individual applicant fails to file a timely license
fee, the commission shall void the application and may not issue
a license to that applicant unless that applicant again complies
with the requirements of subdivisions (4) and (5) and this
subdivision.
(b) To obtain a broker license, a partnership must:
(1) have as partners only individuals who are licensed brokers;
(2) have at least one (1) partner who qualifies as a managing
broker under IC 25-34.1-4-0.5 and IC 25-34.1-4-3;
HEA 1230

27
(3) cause each employee of the partnership who acts as a broker
to be licensed; and
(4) submit the license fee established by the commission under
IC 25-1-8-2 and an application setting forth the name and
residence address of each partner and the information prescribed
in subsection (a)(4).
(c) To obtain a broker license, a corporation must:
(1) have a licensed broker who qualifies as a managing broker
under IC 25-34.1-4-0.5 and IC 25-34.1-4-3;
(2) cause each employee of the corporation who acts as a broker
to be licensed; and
(3) submit the license fee established by the commission under
IC 25-1-8-2, an application setting forth the name and residence
address of each officer and the information prescribed in
subsection (a)(4), a copy of the certificate of incorporation, and a
certificate of good standing of the corporation issued by the
secretary of state.
(d) To obtain a broker license, a limited liability company must:
(1) if a member-managed limited liability company:
(A) have as members only individuals who are licensed
brokers; and
(B) have at least one (1) member who qualifies as a managing
broker under IC 25-34.1-4-0.5 and IC 25-34.1-4-3;
(2) if a manager-managed limited liability company, have a
licensed broker who qualifies as a managing broker under
IC 25-34.1-4-0.5 and IC 25-34.1-4-3;
(3) cause each employee of the limited liability company who acts
as a broker to be licensed; and
(4) submit the license fee established by the commission under
IC 25-1-8-2 and an application setting forth the information
prescribed in subsection (a)(4), together with:
(A) if a member-managed company, the name and residence
address of each member; or
(B) if a manager-managed company, the name and residence
address of each manager, or of each officer if the company has
officers.
(e) Licenses granted to partnerships, corporations, and limited
liability companies are issued, expire, are renewed, and are effective on
the same terms as licenses granted to individual brokers, except as
provided in subsection (h), and except that expiration or revocation of
the license of:
(1) any partner in a partnership or all individuals in a corporation
HEA 1230

28
satisfying subsection (c)(1); or
(2) a member in a member-managed limited liability company or
all individuals in a manager-managed limited liability company
satisfying subsection (d)(2);
terminates the license of that partnership, corporation, or limited
liability company.
(f) Upon the applicant's compliance with the requirements of
subsection (a), (b), or (c), the commission shall issue the applicant a
broker license and an identification card which certifies the issuance
of the license and indicates the expiration date of the license. The
license shall be displayed at the broker's place of business. For at least
two (2) years after the issuance of a license, the individual cannot be a
managing broker. An individual who applies for a broker's license after
June 30, 2014, must, during the first two (2) years after the license is
issued, take and pass at least thirty (30) hours of postlicensing
education focused on the practical matters of real estate transactions
instead of the continuing education requirements under IC 25-34.1-9.
(g) Subject to IC 25-1-2-6(e), unless the license is renewed, a broker
license expires, for individuals, on a date specified by the licensing
agency under IC 25-1-6-4 IC 25-1-5-4 and expires three (3) years after
the initial expiration date. An applicant for renewal shall submit an
application in the manner prescribed by the commission and pay the
renewal fee established by the commission under IC 25-1-8-2 on or
before the renewal date specified by the licensing agency. If the holder
of a license does not renew the license by the date specified by the
licensing agency, the license expires and becomes invalid without the
commission taking any action.
(h) Subject to IC 25-1-2-6(e), if the holder of a license under this
section fails to renew the license on or before the date specified by the
licensing agency, the license may be reinstated by the commission if
the holder of the license, not later than three (3) years after the
expiration of the license, meets the requirements of IC 25-1-8-6(c).
(i) If a license under this section has been expired for more than
three (3) years, the license may be reinstated by the commission if the
holder meets the requirements for reinstatement under IC 25-1-8-6(d).
(j) A partnership, corporation, or limited liability company may be
only a broker company, except as authorized in IC 23-1.5 and subject
to section 4.5 of this chapter. An individual broker who associates with
a broker company shall immediately notify the commission:
(1) of the name and business address of the broker company with
which the individual broker is associating; and
(2) of any changes of the broker company with which the
HEA 1230

29
individual broker is associated that may occur.
Upon receiving notice under subdivision (1) or (2), the commission
shall change the address of the individual broker on its records to that
of the broker company.
SECTION 53. IC 25-34.1-11-11, AS ADDED BY P.L.77-2010,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 11. (a) A person may not own an interest in an
appraisal management company if the person has had the person's
license or certificate to act as a real estate appraiser in Indiana or any
other state revoked, refused, denied, canceled, or surrendered in lieu
of revocation, for a substantive cause, as determined by the
appropriate state appraiser certifying and licensing agency, and the
license or certificate has not been reinstated.
(b) An appraisal management company may only hire an
independent contractor to perform an appraisal who:
(1) holds a license or certificate under IC 25-34.1-3-8 or a license
as a real estate broker under IC 25-34.1; and
(2) is in good standing.
(c) An appraisal management company may not corrupt or
improperly influence a real estate appraiser in violation of
IC 24-5-23.5-7.
SECTION 54. IC 25-34.5-2-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.249-2019,
SECTION 132, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) Subject to IC 25-1-6.5-3, the
committee consists of five (5) members to be appointed by the
governor as follows:
(1) At least two (2) Four (4) practitioners.
(2) At least one (1) physician licensed under IC 25-22.5 who is
familiar with the practice of respiratory care.
(3) (2) At least One (1) member who:
(A) is a resident of Indiana; and
(B) is not associated with the practice of respiratory care in
any way, other than as a consumer.
(b) Each practitioner appointed to the committee must:
(1) be a practitioner meeting the requirements of this article;
(2) have had not less than three (3) years experience in the actual
practice of respiratory care immediately preceding appointment;
and
(3) be a resident of Indiana and actively engaged in Indiana in the
practice of respiratory care while serving as a member of the
committee.
HEA 1230

Speaker of the House of Representatives
President of the Senate
President Pro Tempore
Governor of the State of Indiana
Date: Time:
HEA 1230